District of Columbia statutes.
31-1604

AIDS testing standards, protocols, and appeals.

(a)

(1)

Within 30 days of March 16, 1989, the District of Columbia Commissioner of Public Health (“Commissioner”) shall certify the testing protocol that is the most reliable and accurate in identifying exposure to the probable causative agent of AIDS, ARC, and the HIV infection. The notice of certification shall include an estimate based on scientific evidence of the proportion of false positive results expected in use of the testing protocol.

(2)

Within 12 months from the date of the initial certification and at least annually thereafter, the Commissioner shall publish a new or renewal certification based upon an ongoing review of scientific evidence regarding the accuracy and reliability of the testing protocol.

(b)

(1)

A named insured who tests positive under the testing protocol certified by the Commissioner may appeal to the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] to review the testing procedures and results, and may present additional medical evidence, including the results of similar tests for exposure to the probable causative agent of AIDS that the named insured independently obtains, to rebut the positive test results. If the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] determines that the result of the test of the proposed insured is not a true positive, the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] shall order the insurer from which the applicant sought coverage to disregard the positive test result. The Commissioner of Insurance and Securities [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] shall, when necessary, request the advice of the Commissioner in making this determination.

(2)

Hearings related to the appeal provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be held in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(3)

An insurer shall apply standard underwriting practices, in accordance with applicable laws and rules of the District, to all life, health, or disability income insurance policies or contracts for individuals who test positive under the testing protocol certified by the Commissioner.

History

Aug. 7, 1986, D.C. Law 6-132, § 5, 33 DCR 3615
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-208, § 2(c), 36 DCR 471
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(g), 44 DCR 1730

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-1606.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-224.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.